Washington statutes.
RCW 15.17.290

Violation of chapter or rules—Suspension—Civil penalty.

Any person who violates this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter may be subject to:

(1) Suspension of any compliance agreement under this chapter to which the person is a party for a period not to exceed twelve consecutive months; and/or

(2) A civil penalty in an amount of not more than one thousand dollars for each violation.

[ 1998 c 154 s 18; 1963 c 122 s 30.]